Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1201.16
Community and Rural Development Division; duties.

The Community and Rural Development Division shall provide technical and financial assistance to communities for the preparation of community-based community needs assessment and development strategies. The division shall develop a program to assist communities in finding solutions to the problems identified within the community needs assessment.

Laws 1986, LB 965, § 16;

Laws 1989, LB 639, § 6.